Tennessee, session 114, SB1352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 101, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
No later than January 1, 2026, the department of environment and conservation
shall create and maintain an informational tool on the department's website that provides
data related to the presence of facilities that are required to submit toxic release
inventory data to the environmental protection agency pursuant to the Emergency
Planning and Right-to-Know Act (42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq.). The department shall
maintain the informational tool in a publicly accessible location. The tool must:
(1) Allow an individual to input an address and receive a list of:
(A) Facilities that are located within a five-mile radius of the
address; and
(B) Notice of whether an application has been submitted for the
construction or expansion of a facility that may be subject to the toxic
release reporting requirements within a five-mile radius of the address,
and any information regarding the status of such application, including
any applicable comment or input period related to the application;
(2) Allow an individual to request receipt of a notice if an application for
the construction or expansion of a facility that may be subject to the toxic release
SB1352
003050
- 1 -

reporting requirements is submitted for a location within a five-mile radius of an
address specified by the individual making the request; and
(3) Be updated using information that the department receives regarding
such facilities and applications, including information found in the toxic release
inventory data compiled and made publicly available by the environmental
protection agency. The department shall post such updates within ten (10)
business days of receipt of information that necessitates an update.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003050